Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Purchase of Services for Pregnant Women.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with ch. 37, SLA 1984, which enacted AS

47.40.100

—

47.40.120

, see § 1, ch. 37, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For services for pregnant women, see 7 AAC 55.610 — 7 AAC 55.690.

Sec. 47.40.100.
Purchase of services for pregnant women.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall pay within appropriation the cost of prenatal services which are not available from an existing state or federal program other than medical services for a pregnant woman experiencing social and economic difficulties, including the costs of transportation to and from a maternity home or a foster home, counseling, adoption assistance, maternity home and foster home care, and parenting skills.

History.

(§ 2 ch 37 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.42.010. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For services for pregnant women, see 7 AAC 55, art. 3.

Sec. 47.40.110.
Licensing and supervision.

A person providing services purchased by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

47.40.100

—

47.40.120

shall, if required to be licensed under AS 47.32, be licensed and supervised in the same manner as foster homes and maternity homes under AS 47.32.

History.

(§ 2 ch 37 SLA 1984; am § 19 ch 124 SLA 1994; am § 39 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.42.020. Renumbered in 1984.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated section references.

Sec. 47.40.120.
Regulations.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall adopt regulations to implement AS

47.40.100

—

47.40.120

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 37 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.42.030. Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For services for pregnant women, see 7 AAC 55, art. 3.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.